Massachusetts, session 194th, H4401.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any funds
remaining in the special revolving fund as designated by the town of Athol as VABC
Receivership Account #27000-300-00-3590-0001 established in chapter 143 of the acts of 2016
shall be transferred to the special revolving fund as designated by the town of Athol as VABC
Demo Account #27000-300-00-3590-0002 established in chapter 144 of the acts of 2016. Upon
such transfer of funds the special revolving fund established in said chapter 143 shall be
extinguished.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1